Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.040

Time of granting.

The injunction may be granted at the time of commencing the action, or at any time afterwards, before judgment in that proceeding.

[Code 1881 s 155; 1877 p 33 s 155; 1869 p 39 s 153; 1854 p 153 s 113; RRS s 721.]